Mississippi, session 2026, HB450.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 63-7-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-7-11.  (1)  (a) Every vehicle operated upon a public road, street or highway within this state during the period from sunset to sunrise and at any other time when adverse driving conditions exist due to adverse weather conditions or any other conditions impede visibility and there is not sufficient light to render clearly discernible any person on the highway at a distance of five hundred (500) feet ahead shall be equipped with * * *lighted front and display lights, including headlights, illuminating devices and rear lamps as respectively required in Section 63-7-13 for different classes of vehicles * * *and, subject to exemption with reference to lights on parked vehicles as hereinafter stated in this chapter. (b)  For purposes of this subsection, the term "adverse driving conditions" means: (i)  Rain; (ii)  Snow; (iii)  Ice; (iv)  Sleet; (v)  Fog; (vi)  Any precipitation that necessitates the use of windshield wipers; (vii)  Other adverse weather conditions; or (viii)  Unusual road or traffic conditions that were not known, or could not reasonably be known, to a driver immediately prior to beginning his or her drive. (2)  In those instances when the use of headlights are required because of weather phenomenon producing fog, the driver of vehicles operating in such conditions shall use the low beam function of the vehicle's headlights system, notwithstanding the simultaneous use of fog lamps on vehicles equipped with that feature. (3)  It is unlawful for any vehicle operator to use only the parking lights or auxiliary driving lamps of the vehicle during any time required under subsection (1). (4)  Any person violating the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00), upon conviction. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.